Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-957
List; publication; equipment; treatment; disposition; violation; penalty.

To prevent the dissemination of noxious weeds through any article, including machinery, equipment, plants, materials, and other things, the director shall, from time to time, adopt and promulgate rules and regulations which shall include a list of noxious weeds which may be disseminated through articles and a list of articles capable of disseminating such weeds and shall designate in such rules and regulations treatment of such articles as, in the director's opinion, would prevent such dissemination. Until any such article is treated in accordance with the applicable rules and regulations, it shall not be moved from such premises except under and in accordance with the written permission of the control authority having jurisdiction of the area in which such article is located, and the control authority may hold or prevent its movement from such premises. The movement of any such article which has not been so decontaminated, except in accordance with such written permission, may be stopped by the control authority having jurisdiction over the place in which such movement is taking place and further movement and disposition shall only be in accordance with such control authority's direction. Any further movement of any such article not in accordance with the control authority's direction shall constitute a Class IV misdemeanor.

Laws 1965, c. 7, § 6, p. 84;

Laws 1987, LB 138, § 7;

Laws 1989, LB 49, § 9.